Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 1.1 The State False Claim Act
9-1.1-8.
Funds.

There is hereby created a separate fund entitled the false claims act fund. All proceeds of an action or settlement of a claim brought under this chapter shall be deposited in the fund, with the exception of actions brought directly by a solicitor, in which case the proceeds of an action or settlement of a claim brought under this chapter shall be provided to the respective municipality.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 18, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 227, § 1.

9-1.1-9.
Powers conferred upon municipal solicitors.

All powers conferred under this chapter upon the attorney general with regard to the state are conferred upon solicitors with regard to their respective municipalities in matters involving an action under the false claims act.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 217, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 227, § 2.